Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-672
Receipt or release of information; immunity; exception.

Any person who receives or releases information in the form and manner prescribed by sections 81-663 to 81-675 and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such sections shall not be civilly or criminally liable for such receipt or release unless the receipt or release is done with actual malice, fraudulent intent, or bad faith. In an action brought against a person for wrongful receipt or release of medical record and health information registry information, the party bringing the action shall plead specifically the allegation that the immunity provided in this section does not apply because the person receiving or releasing the information did so with actual malice, fraudulent intent, or bad faith.

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 10;

Laws 2001, LB 152, § 4.